Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1740
Collection of taxes; county treasurer's warrant book; entries.

Each county treasurer is required to keep a book, called the Warrant Book, in which he shall enter every state, county or other warrant or order by him paid, or received in payment of taxes from any person, specifying the date on which the same was received and canceled, from whom received, the payee or person in whose favor it was drawn, its number and date, the amount for which it was drawn, the sum for which it was received, and the interest due thereon, and the treasurer shall keep the account of warrants and orders, by him received for and on account of taxes, separate and distinct from such as are by him paid in cash.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 167, p. 450;

R.S.1913, § 6495;

C.S.1922, § 6023;

C.S.1929, § 77-1928;

R.S.1943, § 77-1740.